California statutes. Insurance Code
(3) Display prominently by type, stamp, or other appropriate means, on the first page of the policy, the following:
“Notice to buyer: This policy may not cover all of your medical expenses.”
(4) Inquire and otherwise make every reasonable effort to identify whether a prospective applicant for a Medicare supplement policy already has health insurance and the types and amounts of that insurance.

(5) Establish auditable procedures for verifying compliance with this subdivision.

(b) In addition to the practices prohibited by this code or any other law, the following acts and practices are prohibited:

(1) Twisting, which means knowingly making any misleading representation or incomplete or fraudulent comparison of any insurance policies or insurers for the purpose of inducing or tending to induce, any person to lapse, forfeit, surrender, terminate, retain, pledge, assign, borrow on, or convert an insurance policy or to take out a policy of
 insurance with another insurer.

(2) High pressure tactics, which means employing any method of marketing having the effect of or tending to induce the purchase of insurance through force, fright, threat, whether explicit or implied, or undue pressure to purchase or recommend the purchase of insurance.

(3) Cold lead advertising, which means making use directly or indirectly of any method of marketing that fails to disclose in a conspicuous manner that a purpose of the method of marketing is the solicitation of insurance and that contact will be made by an insurance agent or insurance company.

(c) The terms “Medicare supplement,” “Medigap,” “Medicare Wrap-Around” and words of similar import shall not be used unless the policy is issued in compliance with this article.

(d) The commissioner each year shall prepare a rate guide for Medicare supplement insurance and Medicare supplement contracts. The commissioner each year shall make the rate guide available on or before the date of the fall Medicare annual open enrollment. The rate guide shall include all of the following for each company that sells Medicare supplemental insurance or Medicare supplement contracts in California:

(1) (A) For policies sold for effective dates prior to June 1, 2010, a listing of all the policies, plans A to L, inclusive, that are available from the company.

(B) For policies sold for effective dates on or after June 1, 2010, a listing of all the policies, plans A to D, inclusive, F, high deductible F, G, and K to N, inclusive, that are available from the company.

(C) For
 policies sold or issued for effective dates on or after January 1, 2020, a listing of all the policies, plans A to D, inclusive, F, high deductible F, G, high deductible G, and K to N, inclusive, that are available from the company.

(2) (A) For policies sold for effective dates prior to June 1, 2010, a listing of all the policies, plans A to L, inclusive, for Medicare beneficiaries under 65 years of age that are available from the company.

(B) For policies sold for effective dates on or after June 1, 2010, a listing of all the policies, plans, A to D, inclusive, F, high deductible F, G, and K to N, inclusive, for Medicare beneficiaries under 65 years of age that are available from the company.

(C) For policies sold or issued for effective dates on or after January 1, 2020, a listing of all the
 policies, plans A to D, inclusive, F, high deductible F, G, high deductible G, and K to N, inclusive, for Medicare beneficiaries under 65 years of age that are available from the company.

(3) The toll-free telephone number of the company that consumers can use to obtain information from the company.

(4) Sample rates for each policy listed pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2). The sample rates shall be for ages 0–65, 65, 70, 75, and 80.

(5) The premium rate methodology for each policy listed pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2). “Premium rate methodology” means attained age, issue age, or community rated.

(6) The waiting period for preexisting conditions for each policy listed pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2).

(e) The consumer rate guide prepared pursuant to subdivision (d) shall be distributed using all of the following methods:

(1) Through Health Insurance Counseling and Advocacy Program (HICAP) offices.

(2) By telephone, using the department’s consumer toll-free telephone number.

(3) On the department’s internet website.

(4) In addition to the distribution methods described in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, each insurer that markets Medicare supplement insurance or Medicare supplement contracts in this state shall provide on the application form a statement that reads as follows: “A rate guide is available that compares the policies sold by different insurers. You can obtain a copy of this rate
 guide by calling the Department of Insurance’s consumer toll-free telephone number (1-800-927-HELP), by calling the Health Insurance Counseling and Advocacy Program (HICAP) toll-free telephone number (1-800-434-0222), or by accessing the Department of Insurance’s internet website (www.insurance.ca.gov).”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 157, Sec. 8.   (SB 784)   Effective July 30, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10192.21.

(a) In recommending the purchase or replacement of any Medicare supplement policy or certificate, an agent shall make reasonable efforts to determine the appropriateness of a recommended purchase or replacement.

(b) Any sale of a Medicare supplement policy or certificate that will provide an individual more than one Medicare supplement policy or certificate is prohibited.

(c) An issuer shall not issue a Medicare
 supplement policy or certificate to an individual enrolled in Medicare Part C unless the effective date of the coverage is after the termination date of the individual’s coverage under Medicare Part C.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 206, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

10192.22.

(a) On or before March 1 of each year, an issuer shall report the following information for every individual resident of this state for which the issuer has in force more than one Medicare supplement policy or certificate:

(1) Policy and certificate number.

(2) Date of issuance.

(b) The items set forth above must be grouped by individual
 policyholder.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 706, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10192.23.

(a) If a Medicare supplement policy or certificate replaces another Medicare supplement policy or certificate, the replacing issuer shall waive any time periods applicable to preexisting conditions, waiting periods, elimination periods, and probationary periods in the new Medicare supplement policy or certificate for similar benefits to the extent that time was spent under the original policy.

(b) If a Medicare supplement policy or certificate replaces another Medicare
 supplement policy or certificate that has been in effect for at least six months, the replacing policy shall not provide any time period applicable to preexisting conditions, waiting periods, elimination periods and probationary periods for benefits similar to those contained in the original policy or certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 706, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10192.24.

This section applies to all policies with policy years beginning on or after May 21, 2009.

(a) In addition to the requirements set forth under Sections 10140 and 10143, an issuer of a Medicare supplement policy or certificate shall adhere to the requirements imposed by the federal Genetic Information Nondiscrimination Act of 2008 (Public Law 110-233) as follows:

(1) The issuer shall not deny or condition the issuance or effectiveness
 of the policy or certificate, including the imposition of any exclusion of benefits under the policy based on a preexisting condition, on the basis of the genetic information with respect to that individual or a family member of the individual.

(2) The issuer shall not discriminate in the pricing of the policy or certificate, including the adjustment of premium rates, of an individual on the basis of the genetic information with respect to that individual or a family member of the individual.

(b) Nothing in subdivision (a) shall be construed to limit the ability of an issuer, to the extent otherwise permitted by law, to do either of the following:

(1) Deny or condition the issuance or effectiveness of the policy or certificate or increase the premium for a group based on the manifestation of a disease or disorder of
 an insured or applicant.

(2) Increase the premium for any policy issued to an individual based on the manifestation of a disease or disorder of an individual who is covered under the policy. For purposes of this paragraph, the manifestation of a disease or disorder in one individual shall not also be used as genetic information about other group members and to further increase the premium for the group.

(c) An issuer of a Medicare supplement policy or certificate shall not request or require an individual or a family member of that individual to undergo a genetic test.

(d) Subdivision (c) shall not be construed to preclude an issuer of a Medicare supplement policy or certificate from obtaining and using the results of a genetic test in making a determination regarding payment, as defined for the purposes of applying
 the regulations promulgated under Part C of Title XI and Section 264 of the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, as may be revised from time to time, and consistent with subdivision (a).

(e) For purposes of carrying out subdivision (d), an issuer of a Medicare supplement policy or certificate may request only the minimum amount of information necessary to accomplish the intended purpose.

(f) An issuer of a Medicare supplement policy or certificate shall not request, require, seek, or purchase genetic information for underwriting purposes.

(g) An issuer of a Medicare supplement policy or certificate shall not request, require, seek, or purchase genetic information with respect to any individual or a family member of that individual prior to the individual’s enrollment under the policy in
 connection with that enrollment.

(h) If an issuer of a Medicare supplement policy or certificate obtains genetic information incidental to the requesting, requiring, or purchasing of other information concerning any individual or a family member of that individual, the request, requirement, or purchase shall not be considered a violation of subdivision (g) if the request, requirement, or purchase is not in violation of subdivision (f). However, the issuer shall not use any genetic information obtained under this section for any prohibited purpose described in this section or in Sections 10140 and 10143.

(i) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Issuer of a Medicare supplement policy or certificate” includes a third-party administrator, or other person acting for or on behalf of
 an issuer.

(2) “Family member” means, with respect to an individual, any other individual who is a first-degree, second-degree, third-degree, or fourth-degree relative of the individual.

(3) “Genetic information” means, with respect to any individual, information about the individual’s genetic tests, the genetic tests of family members of the individual, and the manifestation of a disease or disorder in family members of the individual. The term includes, with respect to any individual, any request for, or receipt of, genetic services, or participation in clinical research that includes genetic services, by the individual or any family member of the individual. Any reference to genetic information concerning an individual or family member of an individual who is a pregnant woman includes genetic information of any fetus carried by that pregnant woman, or with respect to an
 individual or family member utilizing reproductive technology, includes genetic information of any embryo legally held by an individual or family member. The term “genetic information” does not include information about the sex or age of any individual.

(4) “Genetic services” means a genetic test, genetic education, or genetic counseling, including obtaining, interpreting, or assessing genetic information.

(5) “Genetic test” means an analysis of human DNA, RNA, chromosomes, proteins, or metabolites, that detect genotypes, mutations, or chromosomal changes. The term “genetic test” does not mean an analysis of proteins or metabolites that does not detect genotypes, mutations, or chromosomal changes; or an analysis of proteins or metabolites that is directly related to a manifested disease, disorder, or pathological condition that could reasonably be detected by a health care
 professional with appropriate training and expertise in the field of medicine involved.

(6) “Underwriting purposes” includes all of the following:

(A) Rules for, or determination of, eligibility, including enrollment and continued eligibility, for benefits under the policy.

(B) The computation of premium or contribution amounts under the policy.

(C) The application of any preexisting condition exclusion under the policy.

(D) Other activities related to the creation, renewal, or replacement of a policy of health insurance or health benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 10, Sec. 27.   Effective July 2, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Preexisting Condition Provisions [10198.6. - 10198.10.]

10198.6.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Health benefit plan” means any group or individual policy of health insurance, as defined in Section 106. The term does not include coverage of Medicare services pursuant to contracts with the United States government or coverage that provides excepted benefits as described in Sections 2722 and 2791 of the federal Public Health Service Act, subject to Section
 10198.61.

(b) “Preexisting condition provision” means a policy provision that excludes coverage for charges or expenses incurred during a specified period following the insured’s effective date of coverage, as to a condition for which medical advice, diagnosis, care, or treatment was recommended or received during a specified period immediately preceding the effective date of coverage.

(c) “Creditable coverage” means:

(1) Any individual or group policy, contract, or program, that is written or administered by a
 health insurer, health care service plan, fraternal benefits society, self-insured employer plan, or any other entity, in this state or elsewhere, and that arranges or provides medical, hospital, and surgical coverage not designed to supplement other private or governmental plans. The term includes continuation or conversion coverage but does not include accident only, credit, coverage for onsite medical clinics, disability income, Medicare supplement, long-term care insurance, dental, vision, coverage issued as a supplement to liability insurance, insurance arising out of a workers’ compensation or similar law, automobile medical payment insurance, or insurance under which benefits are payable with or without regard to fault and that is statutorily required to be contained in any liability insurance policy or equivalent self-insurance.

(2) The federal Medicare Program pursuant to Title XVIII of the
 federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395 et seq.).

(3) The Medicaid Program pursuant to Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.).

(4) Any other publicly sponsored program, provided in this state or elsewhere, of medical, hospital, and surgical care.

(5) 10 U.S.C. Chapter 55 (commencing with Section 1071) (Civilian Health and Medical Program of the Uniformed Services (CHAMPUS)).

(6) A medical care program of the Indian Health Service or of a tribal organization.

(7) A health plan offered under 5 U.S.C. Chapter 89 (commencing with Section 8901) (Federal Employees Health Benefits Program (FEHBP)).

(8) A public health plan as defined in federal regulations authorized by Section 2701(c)(1)(I) of the federal Public Health Service Act, as amended by Public Law 104-191, the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996.

(9) A health benefit plan under Section 5(e) of the federal Peace Corps Act (22 U.S.C. Sec. 2504(e)).

(10) Any other creditable coverage as defined by subsection (c) of Section 2704 of Title XXVII of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-3(c)).

(d) “Waivered condition provision” means a contract provision that excludes coverage for charges or expenses incurred during a specified period of time for one or more specific, identified, medical conditions.

(e) “Grandfathered health benefit plan” means a health benefit plan that is a grandfathered health plan, as defined in Section 1251 of PPACA.

(f) “Nongrandfathered health benefit plan” means a health benefit plan that is not a grandfathered health plan as defined in Section 1251 of PPACA.

(g) “PPACA” means the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), and any rules, regulations, or guidance issued pursuant to that law.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 12) and added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 852, Sec. 11.   (AB 1083)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Section operative January 1, 2014, pursuant to Section 10198.10.)
-------------------------------------------

10198.61.

(a) For purposes of this article, “health benefit plan” does not include policies or certificates of specified disease or hospital confinement indemnity provided that the carrier offering those policies or certificates complies with the following:

(1) The carrier files, on or before March 1 of each year, a certification with the commissioner that contains the statement and information described in paragraph (2).

(2) The certification required in paragraph (1) shall contain the following:

(A) A statement from the carrier certifying that policies or certificates described in this section (i) are being offered and
 marketed as supplemental health insurance and not as a substitute for coverage that provides essential health benefits as defined by the state pursuant to Section 1302 of PPACA, and (ii) the disclosure form as described in Section 10603 contains the following statement prominently on the first page: “This is a supplement to health insurance. It is not a substitute for essential health benefits or minimum essential coverage as defined in federal
 law.”

(B) A summary description of each policy or certificate described in this section, including the average annual premium rates, or range of premium rates in cases where premiums vary by age, gender, or other factors, charged for the policies and certificates issued or delivered in this state.

(3) In the case of a policy or certificate described in this section and that is offered for the first time in this state for plan years on or after January 1, 2014, the carrier files with the commissioner the information and statement required in paragraph (2) at least 30 days prior to the date such a policy or certificate is issued
 or delivered in this state.

(b) As used in this section, “policies or certificates of specified disease” and “policies or certificates of hospital confinement indemnity” mean policies or certificates of insurance sold to an insured to supplement other health insurance coverage as specified in this section. An insurer issuing a “policy or certificate of specified disease” or a “policy or certificate of hospital confinement indemnity” shall require that the person to be insured is covered by an individual or group policy or contract that arranges or provides medical, hospital, and surgical coverage not designed to supplement other private or governmental plans.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 12) and added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 852, Sec. 11.   (AB 1083)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Section operative January 1, 2014, pursuant to Section 10198.10.)
-------------------------------------------

10198.7.

(a) A health benefit plan for group coverage shall not impose any preexisting condition provision or waivered condition provision upon any individual.

(b) (1) A nongrandfathered health benefit plan for individual coverage shall not impose any preexisting condition provision or waivered condition provision upon any individual.

(2) A grandfathered health benefit plan for individual coverage shall not exclude coverage on the basis of a waivered condition provision or preexisting condition provision for a period greater than 12 months following the individual’s effective date of coverage, nor limit or
 exclude coverage for a specific insured by type of illness, treatment, medical condition, or accident, except for satisfaction of a preexisting condition provision or waivered condition provision pursuant to this article. Waivered condition provisions or preexisting condition provisions contained in individual grandfathered health benefit plans may relate only to conditions for which medical advice, diagnosis, care, or treatment, including use of prescription drugs, was recommended or received from a licensed health practitioner during the 12 months immediately preceding the effective date of coverage.

(3) In determining whether a preexisting condition provision or a waivered condition provision applies to an individual under this subdivision, a health benefit plan shall credit the time the individual was covered under creditable coverage,
 provided that the individual becomes eligible for coverage under the succeeding health benefit plan within 62 days of termination of prior coverage and applies for coverage under the succeeding plan within the applicable enrollment period.

(c) A health benefit plan for group or individual coverage shall not impose a waiting period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 764, Sec. 8.   (SB 326)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10198.8.

This article applies to all health benefit plans that provide benefits to residents of this state regardless of the situs of the contract or group master policyholder.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 12) and added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 852, Sec. 11.   (AB 1083)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Section operative January 1, 2014, pursuant to Section 10198.10.)
-------------------------------------------

10198.9.

A health benefit plan for group coverage shall not establish rules for eligibility, including continued eligibility, of an individual, or dependent of an individual, to enroll under the terms of the plan based on any of the following health status-related factors:

(a) Health status.

(b) Medical condition, including physical and mental illnesses.

(c) Claims experience.

(d) Receipt of health care.

(e) Medical history.

(f) Genetic information.

(g) Evidence of insurability, including conditions arising out of acts of domestic violence.

(h) Disability.

(i) Any other health status-related factor as determined by any federal regulations, rules, or guidance issued pursuant to Section 2705 of the federal Public Health Service Act.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 12) and added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 852, Sec. 11.   (AB 1083)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Section operative January 1, 2014, pursuant to Section 10198.10.)
-------------------------------------------

10198.10.

This article shall become operative on January 1, 2014.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 12) and added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 852, Sec. 11.   (AB 1083)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Note: This section prescribes a delayed operative date (Jan. 1, 2014) for Article 7, commencing with Section 10198.6.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. Health Coverage Contract Notification [10199. - 10199.9.]



  ARTICLE 1. Purpose and Title [10199. - 10199.]

10199.

The purpose of the chapter is to promote the public interest, to prevent unfair and unlawful health care business practices, and to promote adequate consumer and employer advance notice of changes in the cost and benefits of health coverage in order to allow for comparative shopping and to reduce the cost of health coverage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 949, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [10199.1. - 10199.49.]

10199.1.

(a) (1) An insurer or nonprofit hospital service plan or administrator acting on its behalf shall not terminate a group master policy or contract providing hospital, medical, or surgical benefits, increase premiums or charges therefor, reduce or eliminate benefits thereunder, or restrict eligibility for coverage thereunder without providing prior notice of that action. The action shall not become effective unless written notice of the action was delivered by mail to the last known address of the appropriate insurance producer and the appropriate administrator, if any, at least 45 days prior to the effective date of the action and to the last known address of the group policyholder or group contractholder at least 60 days prior
 to the effective date of the action. If nonemployee certificate holders or employees of more than one employer are covered under the policy or contract, written notice shall also be delivered by mail to the last known address of each nonemployee certificate holder or affected employer or, if the action does not affect all employees and dependents of one or more employers, to the last known address of each affected employee certificate holder, at least 60 days prior to the effective date of the action.

(2) The notice delivered pursuant to paragraph (1) for large group health insurance policies shall also include the following information:

(A) Whether the rate proposed to be in effect is greater than the average rate increase for individual market products negotiated by the
 California Health Benefit Exchange for the most recent calendar year for which the rates are final.

(B) Whether the rate proposed to be in effect is greater than the average rate increase negotiated by the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System for the most recent calendar year for which the rates are final.

(C) Whether the rate change includes any portion of the excise tax paid by the health insurer.

(D) How to obtain the rate filing required under Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 10181), including whether the rate change is attributable to changes in medical trend, utilization, or other factors.

(E) How to apply to the
 department to have the proposed rate reviewed by the department if a request is made within 30 days of the notice.

(b) A holder of a master group policy or a master group nonprofit hospital service plan contract or administrator acting on its behalf shall not terminate the coverage of, increase premiums or charges for, or reduce or eliminate benefits available to, or restrict eligibility for coverage of a covered person, employer unit, or class of certificate holders covered under the policy or contract for hospital, medical, or surgical benefits without first providing prior notice of the action. The action shall not become effective unless written notice was delivered by mail to the last known address of each affected nonemployee certificate holder or employer, or if the action does not affect all employees and dependents of one or more
 employers, to the last known address of each affected employee certificate holder, at least 60 days prior to the effective date of the action.

(c) A health insurer that declines to offer coverage to or denies enrollment for a large group applying for coverage shall, at the time of the denial of coverage, provide the applicant with the specific reason or reasons for the decision in writing, in clear, easily understandable language.

(d) (1) For group health insurance policies, if the department determines that a rate is unreasonable or not justified consistent with Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 10181), the insurer shall notify the policyholder of this determination. This notification may be included in the notice required in subdivision (a) or (b).

(2) The notification to the policyholder shall be developed by the department and shall include the following statements in 14-point type:

(A) The Department of Insurance has determined that the rate for this product is unreasonable or not justified after reviewing information submitted to it by the insurer.

(B) The policyholder has the option to obtain other coverage from this insurer or another insurer, or to keep this coverage.

(C) Small business purchasers may want to contact Covered California at www.coveredca.com for help in understanding available options.

(3) The development of the
 notification required under this subdivision shall not be subject to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(4) The insurer may include in the notification to the policyholder the internet website address at which the insurer’s final justification for implementing an increase that has been determined to be unreasonable by the commissioner may be found pursuant to Section 154.230 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(5) The notice shall also be provided to the agent of record for the policyholder, if any, so that the agent may assist the purchaser in finding other coverage.

(6) In developing the notification,
 the department shall take into consideration that this notice is required to be provided to a small group applicant pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 10181.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 807, Sec. 14.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10199.2.

(a) The written notice described in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 10199.1 shall state in italics and in 12-point type the actual dollar amount and the specific percentage of the premium rate increase. Further, the notice shall describe in plain understandable English and highlighted in italics any changes in the plan design or change in benefits with reduction in benefits, waivers, exclusions, or conditions.

(b) The written notice shall specify in a minimum of 10-point bold typeface the reason or reasons for premium rate changes, plan design, or plan benefit changes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 661, Sec. 9.   (SB 1163)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

10199.3.

There shall be no liability on the part of, and no cause of action of any nature shall arise against, any entity required to provide the notice or its authorized representatives, or agents, for any statement made, unless shown to have been made with malice in fact, by any of them in (a) any written notice or in any other oral or written communication specifying the reasons for the notice, (b) any communication providing information pertaining to such notice, or (c) evidence submitted at any court proceeding or informal inquiry in which such notice is at issue.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 949, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10199.4.

Proof of mailing a notice and the reason therefor to the appropriate entity or individual at the last known mailing address shall be sufficient proof of the notice required by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 949, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10199.44.

(a) On or after January 1, 1994, every insurer issuing, amending, or renewing group disability insurance which covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses shall notify the group policyholders in writing of the cancellation of the group policy and shall include in their contract with group policyholders, regardless of the situs of that contract, a provision requiring the group policyholder to mail promptly to each person covered under the group policy a legible, true copy of any notice of cancellation of the policy which may be received from the insurer and to provide promptly to the insurer proof of that mailing and the date thereof.

(b) The notice of cancellation required by subdivision (a) shall include information regarding the conversion rights of persons covered under the group policy upon termination of the group policy. This information shall be in clear and easily understandable language.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1154, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

10199.46.

(a) On or after January 1, 1994, every nonprofit hospital service plan issued, amended, or renewed that covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses on a group basis shall notify the group contractholders in writing of the cancellation of the plan contract and shall include in their contract with group contractholders a provision requiring the group contractholder to mail promptly to each subscriber a legible, true copy of any notice of cancellation of the plan contract which may be received from the plan and to provide promptly to the plan proof of that mailing and the date thereof.

(b) The notice of cancellation required by subdivision (a) shall include information regarding the conversion rights of persons covered under the plan contract upon termination of the plan contract. This information shall be in clear and easily understandable language.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1154, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

10199.48.

(a) No health insurer shall, with regard to a group contract, change the premium rates or applicable copayments or coinsurances or deductibles for the length of the contract, except as specified in subdivision (b), during any of the following time periods:

(1) After the group policyholder or group contractholder has delivered written notice of acceptance of the contract or policy.

(2) After the start of the employer’s annual open enrollment period.

(3) After the receipt of payment of the premium for the first month of coverage in accordance with the contract or policy effective date.

(b) Changes to the premium rates or applicable copayments or coinsurances or deductibles of a contract or policy shall, subject to the insurer meeting the requirements of this chapter, be allowed in any of the following circumstances:

(1) When authorized or required in the group contract or policy.

(2) When the contract or policy was agreed to under a preliminary agreement that states that it is subject to execution of a definitive agreement.

(3) When the insurer and the policyholder or contractholder mutually agree in writing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 336, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10199.49.

(a) This section shall apply to grandfathered health insurance policies and nongrandfathered health insurance policies in the individual or small group markets that are issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2017.

(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 10199.48, a health insurance policy shall not change the cost-sharing design during the policy year, except when required by state or federal law.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Cost sharing” includes any copayment, coinsurance, deductible, or any other form of cost sharing by the insured other than the premium or share of premium.

(2) “Policy year” has the meaning set forth in Section 144.103 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations. For nongrandfathered health insurance policies in the individual market, “policy year” means the calendar year.

(3) “Cost-sharing design” means the amount or proportion of cost sharing applied to a covered benefit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 192, Sec. 2.   (SB 923)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Administration and Enforcement [10199.5. - 10199.9.]

10199.5.

The commissioner may, as conditions warrant, pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, adopt reasonable regulations, and amendments and additions thereto, as are necessary to administer this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 949, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10199.6.

(a) The commissioner shall have the administrative authority to assess penalties against insurers, nonprofit hospital service plans, administrators, and insurance producers, and other entities engaged in the business of insurance or other persons or entities for violations of this chapter.

(b) Upon a showing of a violation of this chapter in any civil action, a court may also assess the penalties described in this chapter.

(c) The commissioner may suspend or revoke the license or licenses issued to any production agent or administrator found, after notice and hearing, to have violated this chapter or a regulation adopted pursuant to the authority of this chapter. Notice of hearing shall be accomplished and a hearing conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the commissioner shall have all of the powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 949, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10199.7.

(a) Any production agent, administrator, or other person or entity engaged in the business of insurance, other than an insurer, who violates this chapter is liable for administrative penalties of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for the first violation.

(b) Any production agent, administrator, or other person or other entity engaged in the business of insurance, other than an insurer, who engages in practices prohibited by this chapter a second or subsequent time, or who commits a knowing violation of this chapter, is liable for administrative penalties of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each violation.

(c) Any insurer who violates this chapter is liable for administrative penalties of not less than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for the first violation.

(d) Any insurer who violates this chapter with a frequency that indicates a general business practice, or commits a knowing violation of this chapter, is liable for administrative penalties of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and not more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for each violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 949, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10199.8.

In addition to any other penalty provided by law or the availability of any administrative procedure, if an insurer, after notice and hearing, is found to have violated this chapter, or regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter, or knowingly permits any person to do so, the commissioner, in accordance with the procedures provided in Section 704, may suspend the insurer’s certificate of authority to transact disability insurance. Section 740.7 shall apply in any proceeding conducted pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 949, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10199.9.

This chapter applies to all master group policies and master group nonprofit hospital service plan contracts providing hospital, medical, or surgical benefits, regardless of policy or contract situs, coverage under which is solicited in any manner in this state.
